Illinois, session 104th, SB539.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Technology Development Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 265/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Technology Development Act.9(Source: P.A. 92-851, eff. 8-26-02.)